Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,104
Certification of trust; additional information authorized.

A certification of trust need not contain the dispositive provisions of the trust, but the person to whom the certification of trust is presented may require copies of, or excerpts from, any trust instrument which designates the trustee or confers upon the trustee power to act in the pending transaction.

Laws 2000, LB 1197, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 30-3703;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 104.